Florida, session 2026, SB1604.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âSection 420.56, Florida Statutes, is created to 15 read: 16 420.56âHomes for Veterans Property Management Incentive 17 Pilot Program trust funds.â 18 (1)âThe Vacancy Relief Trust Fund and the Risk Mitigation 19 Trust Fund are created within the Florida Housing Finance 20 Corporation, to which the Legislature may appropriate funds for 21 the purpose of implementing the Homes for Veterans Property 22 Management Incentive Pilot Program under s. 83.684. 23 (2)âNotwithstanding s. 216.301 and pursuant to s. 216.351, 24 any balance in either trust fund at the end of the fiscal year 25 shall revert and be appropriated to the corporation for the next 26 fiscal year for carrying out the purpose of the trust funds. 27 (3)âIn accordance with s. 19(f)(2), Art. III of the State 28 Constitution, the Vacancy Relief Trust Fund and the Risk 29 Mitigation Trust Fund must, unless terminated sooner, be 30 terminated on July 1, 2030. Before the scheduled termination of 31 the Vacancy Relief Trust Fund and the Risk Mitigation Trust 32 Fund, each trust fund must be reviewed as provided in s. 33 215.3206(1) and (2). 34 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026, if SB 35 1602 or similar legislation is adopted in the same legislative 36 session or an extension thereof and becomes a law.